Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

General Provisions

66-34-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Prompt Pay Act of 1991.”

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1.

66-34-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter indicates another meaning, the words and phrases defined in §66-11-101 have the same meaning as set out in that section and are incorporated in this chapter by reference.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1.

66-34-103. Withholding of retainage — Violations — Penalties.

All construction contracts on any project in this state, both public and private, may provide for the withholding of retainage; provided, however, that the retainage amount may not exceed five percent (5%) of the amount of the contract.

The owner, whether public or private, shall release and pay all retainages for work completed pursuant to the terms of any contract to the prime contractor within ninety (90) days after completion of the work or within ninety (90) days after substantial completion of the project for work completed, whichever occurs first. As used in this subsection (b), “work completed” means the completion of the scope of the work and all terms and conditions covered by the contract under which the retainage is being held. The prime contractor shall pay all retainages due any remote contractor within ten (10) days after receipt of the retainages from the owner. Any remote contractor receiving the retainage from the prime contractor shall pay to any lower-tier remote contractor all retainages due the lower-tier remote contractor within ten (10) days after receipt of the retainages.

Any default in the making of the payments is subject to those remedies provided in this part.

If an owner or prime contractor withholds retainage that is for the use and benefit of the prime contractor or its remote contractors pursuant to § 66-34-104(a) and (b), then neither the prime contractor nor any of its remote contractors are required to deposit additional retained funds into an escrow account in accordance with § 66-34-104(a) and (b).

It is an offense for a person, firm, or corporation to fail to comply with subsection (a) or (b) or § 66-34-104(a).

A violation of this subsection (e) is a Class A misdemeanor, subject to a fine only of three thousand dollars ($3,000).

Each day a person, firm, or corporation fails to comply with subsection (a) or (b) or § 66-34-104(a) is a separate violation of this subsection (e).

Until the violation of this subsection (e) is remediated by compliance, the punishment for each violation is consecutive to all other violations.

In addition to the fine imposed pursuant to subdivisions (e)(2)(A) and (B), the court shall order restitution be made to the owner of the retained funds. In determining the appropriate amount of restitution, the formula stated in § 40-35-304 must be used.

This subsection (e) does not apply to the state, any department, board, or agency thereof, including the University of Tennessee, all counties and municipalities, and all departments, boards, or agencies thereof, including all school and education boards, and any other subdivision of the state.

Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 3; 2008, ch. 804, § 3; 2012, ch. 609, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 7 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2008, ch. 804, § 4 provided that the act, which added (d) and (e), shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2008.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), substituted “‘work completed’ means” for “work completed shall be construed to mean”, “remote contractor” for “subcontractor” twice, and “lower-tier remote contractor” for “subsubcontractor or material supplier” twice; substituted “is” for “shall be” in (c) and (e)(2)(C); in (d), substituted “If” for “In the event that”, substituted “remote contractors” for “subcontractors” twice, and inserted “then”; and added (e)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Preemption of T.C.A. §66-34-103(a) by § 221(d)(4) of the National Housing Act, codified in 12 U.S.C. § 1715l(d)(4), OAG 09-143, 2009 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (7/31/2009).

66-34-104. Retention of portion of contract price in escrow — Applicability — Mandatory compliance.

Whenever, in any contract for the improvement of real property, a certain amount or percentage of the contract price is retained, that retained amount must be deposited in a separate, interest-bearing, escrow account with a third party which must be established upon the withholding of any retainage.

As of the time of the withholding of the retained funds, the funds become the sole and separate property of the prime contractor or remote contractor to whom they are owed, subject to the rights of the person withholding the retainage in the event the prime contractor or remote contractor otherwise entitled to the funds defaults on or does not complete its contract.

If the party withholding the retained funds fails to deposit the funds into an escrow account as provided in this section, then the party shall pay the owner of the retained funds an additional three hundred dollars ($300) per day as damages, not as a penalty, for each and every day that the retained funds are not deposited into an escrow account. Damages accrue from the date retained funds were first withheld and continue to accrue until placed into a separate, interest-bearing escrow account or otherwise paid.

The party with the responsibility for depositing the retained amount in a separate, interest-bearing escrow account with a third party has the affirmative duty to provide written notice that the party has complied with this section to any prime contractor upon withholding the amount of retained funds from each and every application for payment, including:

Identification of the name of the financial institution with which the escrow account has been established;

Account number; and

Amount of retained funds that are deposited in the escrow account with the third party.

Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, to be evidenced by a written release by the owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor owing the retainage, all funds accumulated in the escrow account together with all interest on the account must be paid immediately to the prime contractor or remote contractor to whom the funds and interest are owed.

If the owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor, as applicable, fails or refuses to execute the release provided for in subsection (e), then the prime contractor or remote contractor, as applicable, may seek equitable relief, including injunctive relief, as provided in § 66-34-602, against the owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor. Relief may not be sought against the person holding the retainage as an escrow agent, and that person bears no liability for the nonpayment of the retainage; however, a court may issue an order to the person holding retainage to pay any sums held in trust pursuant to § 66-34-205. The person paying the sums pursuant to a court order bears no liability to the owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor for the payment. All other claims, demands, disputes, controversies, and differences that may arise between the owner, prime contractor, or prime contractors, and remote contractors may be, upon written agreement of all parties concerned, settled by arbitration conducted pursuant to the Uniform Arbitration Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 5, part 3, or the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), as may be applicable.

Subsections (c), (d), and (j) do not apply to the state and any department, board, or agency thereof, including the University of Tennessee; counties and municipalities, and all departments, boards, or agencies thereof, including all school and education boards; and any other subdivision of the state.

This section applies to all prime contracts and all subcontracts thereunder for the improvement of real property when the contract amount of the prime contract is five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or greater, notwithstanding the amount of the subcontracts.

Compliance with this section is mandatory, and shall not be waived by contract.

Failure to deposit the retained funds into an escrow account as provided in this section, within seven (7) days of receipt of written notice regarding the failure, is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, ch. 345, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 64-1148 — 64-1151; Acts 1985, ch. 340, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 551, § 9; 2007, ch. 189, § 43; 2007, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. §66-11-144; Acts 2008, ch. 804, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 609, §§ 2-5; 2020, ch. 749, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-11-144 was transferred to this section by Acts 2008, ch. 805, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 7 provided that the act shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 1, purported to amend subsection (a) with the same amendments enacted by Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 43; therefore, the amendment by ch. 201 was not given effect.

Acts 2008, ch. 804, § 4 provided that the act shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2008.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (c) which read: “In the event that the party withholding the retained funds fails to deposit the funds into an escrow account as provided herein, such party shall be responsible for paying the owner of the retained funds an additional three hundred dollar ($300) penalty per day for each and every day that such retained funds are not deposited into such escrow account.”; in (d), substituted “that the party has complied” for “that it has complied” and deleted “the requirements of” preceding “this section”; substituted “with which” for “with whom” in (d)(1); substituted "owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor" for "owner or prime contractor" in (e); rewrote (f), deleted former (g), and rewrote former (h), redesignated as present (g), which read:

“(f) In the event the owner or prime contractor, as applicable, fails or refuses to execute the release provided for in subsection (c), then the prime contractor or remote contractor, as applicable, may seek any remedy in a court of proper jurisdiction and the person holding the fund as escrow agent shall bear no liability for the nonpayment of the fund to the prime contractor or remote contractor; provided, however, that all claims, demands, disputes, controversies, and differences that may arise between the owner, prime contractor or prime contractors, and remote contractor or remote contractors regarding the funds may be, upon written agreement of all parties concerned, settled by arbitration conducted pursuant to the Tennessee Uniform Arbitration Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, or the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. § 1, et seq.), as may be applicable.

“(g) In contracts to which the state or any department, board or agency of the state, including the University of Tennessee, is a party, interest shall be paid on the retained amounts at the same rate interest is paid on the funds of local governments participating in the local government investment pool established pursuant to §9-4-704, for the contract period.

“(h) This section shall be applicable to the state, any department, board or agency of the state, including the University of Tennessee, and all counties and municipalities and all departments, boards or agencies of the counties and municipalities, including all school and education boards, and any other subdivision of the state.”; redesignated former (i) – (k) as present (h) – (k); and in present (j), substituted “in this section” for “herein” and “seven (7) days of” for “seven (7) days'”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Public contracts, withdrawal of retained funds, §12-4-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-710.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1978).